District of Columbia statutes.
28:11-103

Transition to this act — general rule.

Transactions validly entered into after January 1, 1965 and before the effective date of this act (as provided in section 28:11-101 ), and which were subject to the provisions of articles 1 through 9 of the Uniform Commercial Code, effective January 1, 1965, and which would be subject to this act as amended if they had been entered into after the effective date of this act (as provided in section 28:11-101 ) and the rights, duties and interests flowing from such transactions remain valid after the latter date and may be terminated, completed, consummated or enforced as required or permitted by this act. Security interests arising out of such transactions which are perfected when this act becomes effective shall remain perfected until they lapse as provided in this act, and may be continued as permitted by this act, except as stated in section 28:11-105 .

Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-85, § 40, 29 DCR 309
“This act”, referred to in this section, is D.C. Law 4-85.
1981 Ed., § 28:11-103.